Tennessee, session 114, HB0577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-21-244, is amended by adding
"as well as the legislative librarian" immediately following "state government committee of the
house of representatives".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0577
001366
- 1 -